Utah statutes.
78B-3-202.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  The words "any person" mean any individual, firm, company, association, or corporation.

(2)  The words "transaction of business within this state" mean activities of a nonresident person, his agents, or representatives in this state which affect persons or businesses within the state.

